Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.141

Resignation of agent for service of process.

A registered agent may resign as an agent for service of process of a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a statement of resignation in accordance with RCW 23.95.445.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6106; 2009 c 188 s 116.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.